test/src/morphology/N-rebaenj12_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - repäñ: # Noun (12) repäñ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     repäñ+N+Sg+Nom: repäñ
     repäñ+N+Sg+Gen: rebäse
     repäñ+N+Sg+Par: rebäst
     repäñ+N+Sg+Ill: rebäsehe
     repäñ+N+Pl+Gen: [rebäside, rebäste]
     repäñ+N+Pl+Par: rebäsit
     repäñ+N+Pl+Ill: [rebäsihe, rebästehe]
     repäñ+N+Pl+All: [rebäsile, rebästele]
